Utah statutes.
26-1-34.   Restricted account created to fund drug testing for law
enforcement agencies.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the State Laboratory Drug Testing Account.
(2)  The account consists of a specified portion of fees generated under
Subsection 53-3-106(5) from the reinstatement of certain licenses, which shall
be deposited in this account.
(3)  The Department of Health shall use funds in this account solely for the
costs of performing drug and alcohol analysis tests for state and local law
enforcement agencies, and may not assess any charge or fee to the law
enforcement agencies for whom the analysis tests are performed.
